North Dakota, session 69, SB2018.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. APPROPRIATION. The funds provided in this section, or so much of the funds as may
be necessary, are appropriated out of any moneys in the general fund in the state treasury, not
otherwise appropriated, and from other funds derived from special funds and federal funds, to the
department of commerce for the purpose of defraying the expenses of the department of commerce, for
the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2027, as follows:
Adjustments or
Base Level Enhancements Appropriation
Salaries and wages $15,785,306 $1,912,342 $17,697,648
New and vacant FTE pool 0 582,600 582,600
Operating expenses 19,462,643 7,220,023 26,682,666
Grants 47,636,118 53,921,197 101,557,315
Discretionary funds 2,150,000 0 2,150,000
Workforce programs 0 7,000,000 7,000,000
Partner programs 907,920 0 907,920
Entrepreneurship grants and vouchers 948,467 759,044 1,707,511
Total all funds $86,890,454 $71,395,206 $158,285,660
Less other funds 53,344,371 62,645,336 115,989,707
Total general fund $33,546,083 $8,749,870 $42,295,953
Full-time equivalent positions 62.80 3.00 65.80
SECTION 2. ONE-TIME FUNDING - EFFECT ON BASE BUDGET - REPORT TO SEVENTIETH
LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY. The following amounts reflect the one-time funding items included in the
appropriation in section 1 of this Act which are not included in the entity's base budget for the 2027-29
biennium and which the entity shall report to the appropriations committees of the seventieth legislative
assembly regarding the use of this funding:
One-Time Funding Description General Fund Other Funds Total
Temporary salaries $50,000 $103,590 $153,590
Tourism marketing awareness 0 5,000,000 5,000,000
Operation intern 2,000,000 0 2,000,000
Global talent office 1,000,000 0 1,000,000
Tourism destination development grants 0 15,000,000 15,000,000
Uncrewed aerial vehicle replacement grant 0 9,000,000 9,000,000

S. B. NO. 2018 - PAGE 2
program
Beyond visual line of sight uncrewed 0 15,000,000 15,000,000
aircraft system program
Enhanced use lease grant 0 2,500,000 2,500,000
Autonomous agriculture grants 0 7,500,000 7,500,000
Base enhancement grants 0 1,000,000 1,000,000
Tribally controlled community college grants 750,000 0 750,000
Native American small business grant 0 600,000 600,000
Historic theater restoration grant 0 500,000 500,000
Historic opera house restoration grant 0 250,000 250,000
Historic theater improvement grant 0 250,000 250,000
Medora transportation improvement grant 0 1,000,000 1,000,000
Community hall grant 0 175,000 175,000
Regional planning council grants 1,400,000 0 1,400,000
Entrepreneurship grants and vouchers 759,044 0 759,044
Regional workforce impact program grants 0 5,000,000 5,000,000
Technical skills training grants 1,000,000 0 1,000,000
Total $6,959,044 $62,878,590 $69,837,634
SECTION 3. NEW AND VACANT FTE POOL - LIMITATION - TRANSFER REQUEST. The
department of commerce may not spend funds appropriated in the new and vacant FTE pool line item
in section 1 of this Act, but may request the office of management and budget to transfer funds from the
new and vacant FTE pool line item to the salaries and wages line item in accordance with the
guidelines and reporting provisions included in House Bill No. 1015, as approved by the sixty-ninth
legislative assembly.
SECTION 4. CONTINGENT APPROPRIATION - DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE - STRATEGIC
INVESTMENT AND IMPROVEMENTS FUND - CHILDREN'S EDUCATION SCIENCE CENTER
GRANTS - ONE-TIME FUNDING. There is appropriated out of any moneys in the strategic investment
and improvements fund, not otherwise appropriated, the sum of $2,000,000, or so much of the sum as
may be necessary, to the department of commerce for the purpose of providing grants of up to
$1,000,000 to support the construction of children's education science centers in cities in the state with
a population of at least 50,000 residents, for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30,
2027. The funding appropriated in this section is available only if the state treasurer certifies to the
office of management and budget that oil and gas tax revenue allocations to the strategic investment
and improvements fund under section 57-51.1-07.5 have exceeded $402,000,000 during the 2025-27
biennium. The appropriation in this section is considered a one-time funding item.
SECTION 5. APPROPRIATION - STRATEGIC INVESTMENT AND IMPROVEMENTS FUND -
ATTORNEY GENERAL - AUTONOMOUS TECHNOLOGY GRANTS - MATCHING FUNDS
REQUIREMENT - ONE-TIME FUNDING - LEGISLATIVE MANAGEMENT REPORT.
1. There is appropriated out of any moneys in the strategic investment and improvements fund,
not otherwise appropriated, the sum of $250,000, or so much of the sum as may be
necessary, to the attorney general for the purpose of providing autonomous technology grants
to individuals or entities that aid the bureau of criminal investigation in conducting missing
person searches, crime scene reconstruction, and law enforcement first response operations,
for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2027. The appropriation in this
section is considered a one-time funding item.
2. For purposes of this section, autonomous technology includes uncrewed aircraft systems;
autonomous vehicles; or other autonomous systems, processes, or technologies.
3. The attorney general shall develop an application process and guidelines for the grants,
including eligibility criteria, matching requirements, eligible uses of grant funding, and
maximum grant awards. To be eligible for a grant, an individual or entity shall certify to the
attorney general that the operation of the autonomous technology is related to conducting

S. B. NO. 2018 - PAGE 3
missing person searches, crime scene reconstruction, and law enforcement first response
operations. The attorney general may require an individual or entity to provide one dollar of
matching funds for every four dollars awarded by the state. An individual or entity may use
grant funding for autonomous technology operations, contracting for services related to
autonomous technology, or other eligible uses as determined by the attorney general.
4. During the 2025-26 interim, the attorney general shall provide at least one report to the
legislative management regarding the grants, including a list of grant recipients, the amounts
awarded, and a description of the use of the grant funding.
SECTION 6. APPROPRIATION - STRATEGIC INVESTMENT AND IMPROVEMENTS FUND -
DEPARTMENT OF CAREER AND TECHNICAL EDUCATION - AUTONOMOUS TECHNOLOGY
GRANTS - MATCHING FUNDS REQUIREMENT - ONE-TIME FUNDING - LEGISLATIVE
MANAGEMENT REPORT.
1. There is appropriated out of any moneys in the strategic investment and improvements fund,
not otherwise appropriated, the sum of $250,000, or so much of the sum as may be
necessary, to the department of career and technical education for the purpose of providing
autonomous technology grants to a workforce training center serving the northwest area of the
state for providing workforce training to address workforce shortages in the state, including
shortages in the oil and gas industry, for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, and ending
June 30, 2027. The appropriation in this section is considered a one-time funding item.
2. For purposes of this section, autonomous technology includes uncrewed aircraft systems;
autonomous vehicles; or other autonomous systems, processes, or technologies.
3. The department of career and technical education shall develop an application process and
guidelines for the grants, including eligibility criteria, matching requirements, eligible uses of
grant funding, and maximum grant awards. To be eligible for a grant, a workforce training
center shall certify to the department of career and technical education that the operation of
the autonomous technology is related to workforce training to address workforce shortages in
the state, including shortages in the oil and gas industry. The department of career and
technical education may require a workforce training center to provide one dollar of matching
funds for every four dollars awarded by the state. A workforce training center may use grant
funding for education or training curriculum expenses related to autonomous technology,
autonomous technology operations, contracting for services related to autonomous
technology, or other eligible uses as determined by the department of career and technical
education.
4. During the 2025-26 interim, the department of career and technical education shall provide at
least one report to the legislative management regarding the grants, including a list of grant
recipients, the amounts awarded, and a description of the use of the grant funding.
SECTION 7. APPROPRIATION - STATE FAIR ASSOCIATION - SANITATION RESTORATION
PROJECT - ONE-TIME FUNDING. There is appropriated out of any moneys in the general fund in the
state treasury, not otherwise appropriated, the sum of $350,000, or so much of the sum as may be
necessary, to the state fair association for the purpose of a sanitation restoration project, for the
biennium beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2027. The appropriation in this section is
considered a one-time funding item.
SECTION 8. TRANSFER - INTERNSHIP FUND. The office of management and budget shall
transfer $3,000,000 of the amount appropriated in the operating expenses line item in section 1 of this
Act to the internship fund for the purpose of administering the operation intern program, for the
biennium beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2027.
SECTION 9. TRANSFER - STRATEGIC INVESTMENT AND IMPROVEMENTS FUND TO
LEGACY INVESTMENT FOR TECHNOLOGY FUND. The office of management and budget shall
transfer the sum of $10,000,000 from the strategic investment and improvements fund to the legacy

S. B. NO. 2018 - PAGE 4
investment for technology fund for the purpose of providing legacy investment technology loans, for the
biennium beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2027.
SECTION 10. TRANSFER - STRATEGIC INVESTMENT AND IMPROVEMENTS FUND TO
NORTH DAKOTA DEVELOPMENT FUND - EXEMPTION. The office of management and budget shall
transfer the sum of $25,000,000 from the strategic investment and improvements fund to the North
Dakota development fund for programs under chapter 10-30.5, for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025,
and ending June 30, 2027. Notwithstanding section 10-30.5-02, the North Dakota development fund
may use up to $10,000,000 of the funds provided in this section for nonprimary sector business
activities.
SECTION 11. BANK OF NORTH DAKOTA LINE OF CREDIT - TRANSFER TO NORTH DAKOTA
DEVELOPMENT FUND. The department of commerce may borrow up to $25,000,000 through a line of
credit from the Bank of North Dakota during the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30,
2027, the proceeds of which must be transferred to the North Dakota development fund for programs
under chapter 10-30.5. The interest rate associated with the line of credit may not exceed the prevailing
interest rate charged to North Dakota governmental entities. The department of commerce shall repay
the line of credit from moneys available in the North Dakota development fund. If the moneys available
in the North Dakota development fund are not sufficient to repay the line of credit, the department of
commerce shall request a deficiency appropriation from the seventieth legislative assembly to repay the
line of credit.
SECTION 12. RURAL HEALTH CARE GRANT PROGRAM - MATCHING FUNDS
REQUIREMENT. The grants line item in section 1 of this Act includes $444,000 from the general fund
for providing matching funds to an organization assisting in the recruitment, distribution, and supply, and
enhancing the quality and efficiency of personnel providing health services in rural areas of the state.
The department of commerce may spend the funds appropriated in this section only to the extent the
organization has secured matching funds from nonstate sources on a dollar-for-dollar basis.
SECTION 13. OTHER FUNDS - STRATEGIC INVESTMENT AND IMPROVEMENTS FUND -
MATCHING FUNDS REQUIREMENT - APPLICATION. The other funds line item in section 1 of this Act
includes the sum of $62,775,000 from the strategic investment and improvements fund, of which:
1. $5,000,000 is for tourism marketing awareness, including $250,000 for supporting the
continuation of the North Dakota state magazine with the current publisher of the magazine;
2. $15,000,000 is for tourism destination development grants;
3. $9,000,000 is for an uncrewed aerial vehicle replacement program;
4. $15,000,000 is for the beyond visual line of sight uncrewed aircraft system program;
5. $2,500,000 is for the enhanced use lease grant program;
6. $7,500,000 is for autonomous agriculture grants;
7. $1,000,000 is for providing base enhancement grants to communities with an air force base or
air national guard facilities, including $600,000 to eligible organizations in Minot, $250,000 to
eligible organizations in Grand Forks, and $150,000 to eligible organizations in Fargo;
8. $600,000 is for a Native American small business grant;
9. $500,000 is for a historic theater restoration grant, which the department of commerce may
spend only to the extent an organization has secured one dollar of matching funds from
nonstate sources for every one dollar provided by the department of commerce;
10. $250,000 is for a historic opera house restoration grant;
11. $250,000 is for a historic theater improvement grant;

S. B. NO. 2018 - PAGE 5
12. $1,000,000 is for a Medora transportation improvement grant;
13. $175,000 is for a community hall grant; and
14. $5,000,000 is for regional workforce impact program grants.
The requirements of chapter 54-44.4 do not apply to the selection of a grant recipient, the grant award,
or payments made under this section.
SECTION 14. OTHER FUNDS - STRATEGIC INVESTMENT AND IMPROVEMENTS FUND -
UNCREWED AERIAL VEHICLE REPLACEMENT PROGRAM - LEGISLATIVE MANAGEMENT
REPORT. The other funds line item in section 1 of this Act includes the sum of $9,000,000 which the
department of commerce shall use for the purpose of administering an uncrewed aerial vehicle
replacement program, for the period beginning with the effective date of this Act, and ending June 30,
2027.
1. The department of commerce shall collaborate with the uncrewed aircraft systems test site
established in section 54-60-28 and state agencies, including institutions under the control of
the state board of higher education, to replace uncrewed aerial vehicles owned by the state
which do not comply with requirements of the federal National Defense Authorization Act and
the American Security Drone Act of 2023. The information technology department, in
consultation with the department of commerce and the uncrewed aircraft systems test site,
may implement an enterprise uncrewed aerial vehicle data management solution. An
enterprise uncrewed aerial vehicle data management solution implemented under this section
must ensure all data collected, transmitted, stored, and consumed by an uncrewed aerial
vehicle remain under the control of the state. As used in this section "enterprise uncrewed
aerial vehicle data management solution" means a system for secure, end-to-end data
collection, transportation, storage, processing, and consumption through enterprise software.
A state agency owning an uncrewed aerial vehicle before January 1, 2025, is eligible to
receive a new uncrewed aerial vehicle that is in compliance with federal requirements and is
of equivalent capability to the agency's existing uncrewed aerial vehicle. The department of
commerce shall purchase each uncrewed aerial vehicle based on the needs of the agency
and a recommendation from the uncrewed aircraft systems test site and provide the uncrewed
aerial vehicle to the agency. The department of commerce shall use a portion of the funding
provided in this section to pay for training needed for agency staff to operate the new
uncrewed aerial vehicle. The department of commerce and uncrewed aircraft systems test site
shall give priority to state agencies willing to share uncrewed aerial vehicles rather than
purchasing multiple uncrewed aerial vehicles.
2. Any uncrewed aerial vehicle replaced under this section must be remitted to the uncrewed
aircraft systems test site for proper decommissioning and disposal pursuant to federal and
state regulations, which may include the sale of uncrewed aerial vehicles to the United States
department of homeland security at market rates for use in the counter unmanned aircraft
system program. The department of commerce shall remit any funding received under this
section to the state treasurer for deposit in the general fund.
3. The department of commerce shall maintain an inventory of uncrewed aerial vehicles
purchased for state agencies under this section and encourage state agencies to use the state
beyond visual line of sight program. The uncrewed aircraft systems test site shall provide
guidance to state agencies regarding the integration of uncrewed aerial vehicles into the
beyond visual line of sight system and proper maintenance schedules for uncrewed aerial
vehicles. The uncrewed aircraft systems test site shall establish a centralized system for state
agencies to register uncrewed aerial vehicles and authorized operators for accessing the
beyond visual line of sight system and shall provide operational support when state agencies
use uncrewed aircraft systems test site integrated platforms.
4. During the 2025-26 interim, the department of commerce shall compile information from state
agencies and provide a report to the legislative management by June 30, 2026, regarding the

S. B. NO. 2018 - PAGE 6
status of the program, funding spent on uncrewed aerial vehicle replacements and training
costs, the number of uncrewed aerial vehicles replaced in each state agency, the number of
uncrewed aerial vehicles sold or disposed, and any future needs for each state agency to be
compliant with the federal National Defense Authorization Act and the American Security
Drone Act of 2023.
SECTION 15. TRIBALLY CONTROLLED COMMUNITY COLLEGE GRANTS - LEGISLATIVE
MANAGEMENT REPORT. The grants line item in section 1 of this Act includes $750,000 from the
general fund for the purpose of providing workforce development grants to a tribally controlled
community college. To be eligible for a grant under this section, a tribally controlled community college
shall partner with at least one high school in the state for programs under section 54-60.2-02. During
the 2025-26 interim, a tribally controlled community college receiving funding under this program shall
report to the department of commerce by August 1, 2026, regarding the use of grant funds and the
department of commerce shall provide a report to the legislative management by October 1, 2026,
regarding the use of grant funds.
SECTION 16. DISCRETIONARY FUNDS - REGIONAL PLANNING COUNCIL GRANTS. The
discretionary funds line item in section 1 of this Act includes $2,150,000 from the general fund, of which
$600,000 is designated for grants to support regional planning councils under chapter 54-40.1.
SECTION 17. AMENDMENT. Subsection 1 of section 10-30.5-02 of the North Dakota Century
Code is amended and reenacted as follows:
1. It is the purpose of this chapter to create a statewide nonprofit development corporation that
will have the authority to take equity positions in, to provide loans to, orto form a management
and operations entity, and to use other innovative financing mechanisms to provide capital for
new or expanding businesses in this state, or relocating businesses to this state. The
corporation's principal mission is the development and expansion of primary sector business
in this state. The corporation may form additional corporations, limited liability companies,
partnerships, joint ventures, or other forms of business associations in order to further its
mission of primary sector economic development.
SECTION 18. A new section to chapter 54-60 of the North Dakota Century Code is created and
enacted as follows:
Reporting requirements - Budget section - Grant programs.
The department shall compile a report regarding grant programs administered by the department,
excluding federally funded programs, to be provided semiannually to the budget section. The report
must include the following for each grant program:
1. The purpose of the grant program;
2. Funding history;
3. The number of days the grant application was open to applicants;
4. The name of each grant recipient and the amount of each grant award; and
5. The distribution date of grant funds or the anticipated distribution date of grant funds.
SECTION 19. AMENDMENT. Section 54-60-09 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended and
reenacted as follows:
54-60-09. Division of workforce development - Duties - Report.
The division of workforce development shall:

S. B. NO. 2018 - PAGE 7
1. Actively monitor local, regional, and national private and public workforce development
initiatives.
2. Develop and implement the state's talent strategy.
3. Develop and implement a statewide intelligence coordination strategycontinually refine the
state workforce mission, vision, and strategies.
4. Conduct regular employer talent and skills supply and demand studies, the results of which
must be reported to a standing committee of each house of the legislative assembly as
determined by the legislative management during each regular legislative session.
SECTION 20. AMENDMENT. Section 54-60-19 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended and
reenacted as follows:
54-60-19. Division of workforce development - Talent strategy - Performance and
accountability - Report.
1. The division of workforce development, in developing and implementing the state's talent
strategy, shall:
a. Consult with partners in the state's system for workforce development, workforce training,
and talent attractionCollect data on all workforce programs administered by state
agencies, including job service North Dakota, the department of career and technical
education, the superintendent of public instruction, the state board of higher education,
the department of health and human services, and other divisions of the department of
commerce, to determine standard measurements of success and to compile and analyze
the program data in a report to be provided to a standing committee of each house of the
legislative assembly as determined by the legislative management during each regular
legislative session.
b. Develop a comprehensive, consolidated biennial statewide strategic plan for the state's
system for workforce development, workforce training, and talent attraction.
c. Continuously review, identify how to improve, and implement improvements to the state's
system for workforce development, workforce training, and talent attraction.
d. Develop linkages between partners of the state's system for workforce development,
workforce training, and talent attraction, to assure coordination and nonduplication of
programs and services provided in the stateReview all workforce development programs
administered by state agencies for the coordination and prevention of duplication of
workforce development services.
2. The division of workforce development shall develop and implement a system of performance
and accountability measures for the state's system for workforce development, workforce
training, and talent attraction. Each partner of the state's system for workforce development,
workforce training, and talent attraction shall cooperate in providing the division the data
necessary to implement these measures.
SECTION 21. AMENDMENT. Section 54-60-28 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended and
reenacted as follows:
54-60-28. Uncrewed aircraft systems program - Report to legislative management.
1. The department may operate and administer an uncrewed aircraft systems test site,
contingent upon receiving official designation by the federal aviation administration. The
department may cooperate and contract with the university of North Dakota, the North Dakota
aeronautics commission, the adjutant general, and other public or private entities as
determined by the commissioner in the operation and administration of the test site. The

S. B. NO. 2018 - PAGE 8
department may charge fees sufficient to operate the test site. The department shall, to the
extent possible, use competitive bidding in the operation and administration of the test site.
The commissioner may charter a public corporation to operate the test site. The corporation
must possess all of the powers of a business corporation consistent with this chapter. The
department shall report to the legislative management semiannually on the status of the
program.
2. In administering the uncrewed aircraft systems program, the uncrewed aircraft systems test
site established in subsection 1 may :
a. Enter contracts and agreements with public, private, and nonprofit organizations for
projects, activities, and research topics, and for the operation and management of a
public - private partnership under chapter 48 - 02.1 ;
b. Enter partnerships, limited liability companies, joint ventures, or other contractual
arrangements with private businesses for the purpose of business or industrial
development; and
c. Adopt policies governing ownership or transfer of ownership rights and distribution of
income that may be derived from an invention or discovery resulting from research or
employment in the uncrewed aircraft systems test site.
SECTION 22. AMENDMENT. Section 54-60-29 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended and
reenacted as follows:
54-60-29. Uncrewed aircraft systems program fund - Continuing appropriation.
1. There is created in the state treasury a special fund known as the uncrewed aircraft systems
fund, which may be used to defray the expenses of the:
a. Operations of an uncrewed aircraft systems test site officially designated by the federal
aviation administration;
b. Beyond visual line of sight uncrewed aircraft system program; and
c. Enhanced use lease grant program.
2. The fund consists of fees, royalties, gifts, grants, devises, bequests, donations, assignments,
and other revenue collected for the administration of the test site and federal and other funds
appropriated by the legislative assembly. All moneys in the fund are appropriated to the
department of commerce on a continuing basis for the purpose of defraying the expenses of
the programs identified in subsection 1. Interest earned on moneys in the fund must be
credited to the fund.
SECTION 23. AMENDMENT. Section 54-60-29.1 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended
and reenacted as follows:
54-60-29.1. Beyond visual line of sight uncrewed aircraft system program - Requirements -
Report to legislative management.
The department may establish and administer a beyond visual line of sight uncrewed aircraft
system program for the design, purchase, implementation, and operating costs of a beyond visual line
of sight uncrewed aircraft system. The department may enter contracts, agreements, and contractual
arrangements and adopt policies related to the beyond visual line of sight uncrewed aircraft system
program in the same manner authorized for the uncrewed aircraft system program under
section 54 - 60 - 28 . The department shall require any entity receiving funding for this program which is
operating the beyond visual line of sight uncrewed aircraft system to provide quarterly payments to the
state treasurer based on a fee structure determined by the commissioner. The state treasurer shall
deposit any funds received under this section in the state general fund. The department shall provide

S. B. NO. 2018 - PAGE 9
semiannual reports to the legislative management regarding the development of the beyond visual line
of sight uncrewed aircraft system program and the total amount deposited by the state treasurer in the
state general fund.
SECTION 24. AMENDMENT. Section 54-60-31 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended and
reenacted as follows:
54-60-31. Office of legal immigrationGlobal talent office - Duties.
There is created an office of legal immigration a global talent office within the department of
commerce. Employees of the office of legal immigrationglobal talent office report to the commissioner.
The office of legal immigrationglobal talent office:
1. Shall develop and implement a statewide strategy to support businesses in recruiting and
retaining foreign labor, including immigrants already in the United States and integration of
immigrants into the state to promote economic opportunities for immigrant communities.
2. Shall advise and make recommendations to the governor, legislative assembly, and state
agencies regarding immigrant integration and foreign labor issues.
3. Shall develop a pilot program to support businesses pursuing or employing legal immigrants
and to support communities to develop immigration integration plans and activities.
4. May contract with other state agencies to develop and administer programs or services related
to immigration integration and access to basic needs that promote entrance and movement
throughout the workforce.
5. May contract with an organization with expertise related to the goals of the office of legal
immigrationglobal talent office.
SECTION 25. EXEMPTION - UNEXPENDED APPROPRIATIONS. The following appropriations are
not subject to the provisions of section 54-44.1-11 and any unexpended funds from these
appropriations may be continued into the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2027:
1. The sum of $3,000,000 appropriated from federal COVID-19 funds for the community
development block grant program in section 1 of chapter 27 of the 2021 Session Laws and
continued into the 2023-25 biennium in section 29 of chapter 18 of the 2023 Session Laws.
2. The sum of $56,234,176 appropriated from federal COVID-19 funds for the state small
business credit initiative program in section 2 of chapter 28 of the 2021 Session Laws and
continued into the 2023-25 biennium in section 29 of chapter 18 of the 2023 Session Laws.
3. The sum of $15,000,000 appropriated from the federal state fiscal recovery fund for the
workforce development incentive grant program in subsection 38 of section 1 of chapter 550
of the 2021 Special Session Session Laws and continued into the 2023-25 biennium in
section 29 of chapter 18 of the 2023 Session Laws.
4. The sum of $5,000,000 appropriated from the federal state fiscal recovery fund for the
technical skills training grant program in subsection 39 of section 1 of chapter 550 of the 2021
Special Session Session Laws and continued into the 2023-25 biennium in section 29 of
chapter 18 of the 2023 Session Laws.
5. The sum of $28,500,000 appropriated from the general fund for workforce programs, of which
$12,000,000 was for workforce talent attraction initiative operating expenses, $12,500,000
was for workforce investment program grants, $2,000,000 was for technical skills training
grants, and $2,000,000 was for new Americans workforce development and training grants, in
section 1 of chapter 18 of the 2023 Session Laws.

S. B. NO. 2018 - PAGE 10
6. The sum of $25,000,000 appropriated from the strategic investment and improvements fund
for the tourism destination development initiative in section 1 of chapter 18 of the 2023
Session Laws.
7. The sum of $10,000,000 appropriated from the strategic investment and improvements fund
for the enhanced use lease grant program in section 1 of chapter 18 of the 2023 Session
Laws.
8. The sum of $120,000,000 appropriated from federal funds for weatherization and energy
assistance programs in section 1 of chapter 18 of the 2023 Session Laws.
9. The sum of $2,150,000 appropriated from the general fund for discretionary funds in section 1
of chapter 18 of the 2023 Session Laws.
10. The sum of $3,258,084 appropriated from federal funds for heating, furnace, and cooling
assistance grants in section 1 of chapter 18 of the 2023 Session Laws.
11. The sum of $14,081,719 appropriated from federal funds for energy conservation assistance
grants in section 1 of chapter 18 of the 2023 Session Laws.
12. The sum of $1,550,000 appropriated from federal funds for the parks and recreation program
in section 1 of chapter 18 of the 2023 Session Laws, which may be used for operating
expenses of the program.
13. The sum of $572,143 appropriated from federal funds for the state small business credit
initiative program in section 1 of chapter 18 of the 2023 Session Laws.
14. The sum of $948,467, of which $740,956 is from the general fund and $207,511 is from the
economic development fund, for the entrepreneurship grants and vouchers program in
section 1 of chapter 18 of the 2023 Session Laws.
15. The sum of $2,000,000 appropriated from the general fund for the office of legal immigration in
section 1 of chapter 639 of the 2023 Special Session Session Laws.

S. B. NO. 2018 - PAGE 11
____________________________ ____________________________
President of the Senate Speaker of the House
____________________________ ____________________________
Secretary of the Senate Chief Clerk of the House
This certifies that the within bill originated in the Senate of the Sixty-ninth Legislative Assembly of North
Dakota and is known on the records of that body as Senate Bill No. 2018.
Senate Vote: Yeas 27 Nays 17 Absent 3
House Vote: Yeas 66 Nays 22 Absent 6
____________________________
Secretary of the Senate
Received by the Governor at ________M. on _____________________________________, 2025.
Approved at ________M. on __________________________________________________, 2025.
____________________________
Governor
Filed in this office this ___________day of _______________________________________, 2025,
at ________ o’clock ________M.
____________________________
Secretary of State